District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-301.07

Definitions.

Repealed.

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 107, 32 DCR 7396
May 23, 1986, D.C. Law 6-116, § 3(a), 33 DCR 2432
June 28, 1994, D.C. Law 10-134, § 6(a), 41 DCR 2597
Apr. 12, 1997, D.C. Law 11-259, § 101(e), 44 DCR 1423
May 8, 1998, D.C. Law 12-104, § 2(d), 45 DCR 1687
Sept. 16, 2000, D.C. Law 13-155, § 2(a), 47 DCR 5035
Apr. 4, 2001, D.C. Law 13-274, § 2, 48 DCR 1654
Apr. 4, 2003, D.C. Law 14-284, § 2(a), 50 DCR 935
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, §§ 102(b), 103, 51 DCR 881
Apr. 5, 2005, D.C. Law 15-281, § 2(a), 52 DCR 847
June 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-122, § 2(c), 53 DCR 2834
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-305, § 8, 53 DCR 6198
June 5, 2008, D.C. Law 17-173, § 2(a), 55 DCR 5383
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 106(b), 56 DCR 1117
Oct. 22, 2009, D.C. Law 18-64, § 2(a), 56 DCR 6603
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 1201(a), 58 DCR 1185
1981 Ed., § 1-1181.7.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 6(a) of South Africa Sanctions Repeal Act of 1993 (D.C. Law 10-75, March 8, 1994, law notification 41 DCR 1518)
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3(d) of the Procurement Reform Temporary Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-17, September 12, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 5459)
For temporary repeal of the Department of Corrections Procurement and Privatization Exemption Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-220, February 23, 1996, 43 DCR 1176), see § 2 of the Department of Corrections Privatization Facilitation Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-29, March 18, 1997, 44 DCR 1897).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 3(d) of the Procurement Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-62, April 15, 1997, 44 DCR 2413), and § 3(d) of the Procurement Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-133, August 12, 1997, 44 DCR 4832).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(d) of the Procurement Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-374, April 24, 1998, 45 DCR 4338).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of the Procurement Practices Human Care Agreement Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-348, June 5, 2000, 47 DCR 5009).